Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-510
Pledge of taxes authorized.

In the proceedings for the issuance of bonds, the making of loans or advances of money, or the incurring of any indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, by a contracting public body to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, a redevelopment project, the portion of taxes mentioned in subdivision (2) of section 58-507 shall be pledged for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, loans, notes, advances, or indebtedness.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 10.